Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1812.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 1102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Digital asset." A digital representation of value that is recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger or similar technology. The term includes cryptocurrency, meme coin, non-fungible token and stablecoin.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. Section 1103 of Title 65 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1103. Restricted activities.* * *(k) Financial interest in digital asset.--(1) A public official or a member of the public official's immediate family may not engage directly or indirectly in a prohibited financial transaction during:(i) the term of service of the public official; or(ii) the one-year period beginning on the date on which the service of the public official is terminated.(2) (i) If, at the time of the effective date of this paragraph, a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family has a financial interest in a digital asset, the public official or the public official's immediate family shall have 90 days to divest the financial interest.(ii) If, at the beginning of the term of service for a public official, the public official or a member of the public official's immediate family has a financial interest in a digital asset, the public official or the public official's immediate family shall have 90 days to divest the financial interest.(3) The following words and phrases when used in this subsection shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Directly." By virtue of the ownership or beneficial interest of a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family in a financial interest described in the definition of "prohibited financial transaction."20250HB1812PN2229 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Indirectly." By virtue of the financial interest of a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family in a business entity, partnership interest, company, investment fund, trust or other third party in which a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family has an ownership or beneficial interest."Prohibited financial transaction." Includes any of the following:(i) The issuance, sponsorship or endorsement of a digital asset.(ii) The purchase, sale, holding or other conduct that causes a public official or a member of the public official's immediate family to obtain a digital asset.(iii) The acquisition of a financial interest comparable to an interest described in subparagraph (i) or (ii) that is acquired through synthetic means, such as the use of a derivative, including an option, a warrant or other similar means.(iv) The acquisition of a financial interest comparable to an interest described in subparagraph (i) or (ii) that is acquired as part of an aggregation or compilation of the interests through a mutual fund, exchange-traded fund or other similar means.Section 3. Section 1105(c) of Title 65 is amended and subsection (b) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1105. Statement of financial interests.* * *(b) Required information.--The statement shall include the following information for the prior calendar year with regard to the person required to file the statement:20250HB1812PN2229 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(11) The amount of any financial interest in a digital asset exceeding $1,000.(c) Reporting amounts.--Except where an amount is required to be reported pursuant to subsection [(b)(6) and (7)] (b)(6), (7) and (11), the statement of financial interests need not include specific amounts for the items required to be listed.* * *Section 4. Section 1109(a) of Title 65 is amended to read:§ 1109. Penalties.(a) Restricted activities violation.--(1) Any person who violates the provisions of section 1103(a), (b) and (c) (relating to restricted activities) commits a felony and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.(2) Any person who violates the provisions of section 1103(k) shall pay a civil penalty of not more than $50,000.* * *Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1812PN2229 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920